Hawaii statutes.
Rule 609.1 Evidence of bias, interest, or
motive. (a) General rule. The credibility of a witness may be attacked
by evidence of bias, interest, or motive.

(b) Extrinsic evidence of bias, interest, or
motive. Extrinsic evidence of a witness' bias, interest, or motive is not
admissible unless, on cross-examination, the matter is brought to the attention
of the witness and the witness is afforded an opportunity to explain or deny
the matter. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1]

RULE 609.1 COMMENTARY

This rule has no federal counterpart, which means that
common-law principles of bias, interest, or motive impeachment govern the
practice in the federal courts. The problem is that the common law is divided
on the question whether the impeaching material must, on cross-examination, be
brought to the attention of the witness being impeached as a precondition to
the proffer of extrinsic evidence. McCormick §40.

Rule 609.1 settles the issue and restates the rule of State
v. Murphy, 59 H. 1, 17-18, 575 P.2d 448, 459-60 (1978):

The general rule is that a witness
may be impeached through a showing of bias, hostility or prejudice, and this
may be done by use of the witness' own testimony or by other evidence.... We
believe that the correct rule is ... that before any bias of a witness can be
introduced, a foundation must first be laid by cross-examining the witness
regarding the facts which assertedly prove the bias. Two reasons [are]
recognized ... for such a preliminary foundation. First, the foundational
cross-examination gives the witness a fair opportunity to explain statements or
equivocal facts which, standing alone, tend to show bias. Second, such
cross-examination lends expediency to trials, for if the facts showing bias are
admitted by the witness, the introduction of extrinsic evidence becomes
unnecessary.

Case Notes

Admission of evidence of bias rests in the trial court's
discretion. 67 H. 581, 698 P.2d 293 (1985).

Bias, interest, or motive is always relevant. 69 H. 204, 738
P.2d 812 (1987).

Trial court abused discretion by unconstitutionally excluding
evidence of complainant's prior conviction, by prohibiting cross-examination of
complainant, from which jury could have inferred that complainant had a motive
to bring false charges against defendant and give false testimony at trial. 83
H. 109, 924 P.2d 1215 (1996).

Trial court was correct only insofar as it stated, by
quoting this rule, that the credibility of a witness may be attacked by
evidence of bias, interest, or motive, and that such evidence pertaining to a
witness' credibility is always relevant and admissible at trial; trial court
erred, however, in ruling that such evidence could be used by the jury in
considering petitioners' motives as plaintiffs in filing the present lawsuit.
129 H. 313, 300 P.3d 579 (2013).

Where relevant evidence of witness' potential bias was
elicited at trial, trial court properly balanced the prejudice concerns of
defendant with the relevance and probative value of liability insurance
evidence to reveal witness' potential bias; thus, trial court did not abuse its
discretion in limiting evidence of bias, interest or motive with due regard for
rule 403. 106 H. 298 (App.), 104 P.3d 336 (2004).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next